Utah statutes.
11-3-3.5.   Licensing of retail sellers of fireworks -- Permit required --
Fee, insurance, or bond.
(1) (a)  A municipality or county may require a retail seller to obtain a
license and pay a reasonable fee before selling class C common state-approved
explosives within the jurisdiction of that municipality or county.
(b)  A municipality or county may not restrict the number of licenses to be
issued under this section.
(2) (a)  A municipality or county shall require:
(i)  a permit to discharge all display fireworks, special effects, and flame
effects performances; and
(ii)  evidence that the display operator, special effects operator, or flame
effects operator who will set up and discharge the display has received a
license from the State Fire Marshal Division, Department of Public Safety.
(b)  A municipality or county may require a fee, insurance, or a bond before
issuing a permit under this Subsection (2).
